en: Deer filets
fr: Filets de cerf

en: Frozen deer filets
fr: Filets de cerf surgelés

en: Deer haunch
fr: Cuissot de cerf

en: Frozen deer haunch
fr: Cuissot de cerf surgelé

en: Deer neck
fr: Cou de cerf

en: Frozen deer neck
fr: Cou de cerf surgelé

en: Deer loin
fr: Longe de cerf

en: Frozen deer loin
fr: Longe de cerf surgelé

en: Cooked game
fr: Gibier à poils cuit

en: Cooked feathered game, Cooked feathered game meat
fr: Gibier à plumes cuit, Viande de gibier à plumes cuit

en: Roasted venison, Baked venison, Roasted roebuck, Baked roebuck
fr: Chevreuil rôti, Chevreuil cuit au four

en: Roasted wild boar, Baked wild boar
fr: Sanglier rôti, Sanglier cuit au four

en: Roasted hart, Baked hart
fr: Cerf rôti, Cerf cuit au four

en: Venison stew
fr: Ragoût de chevreuil

en: Frozen venison stew
fr: Ragoût de chevreuil surgelé

en: Deer stew
fr: Ragoût de cerf

en: Frozen deer stew
fr: Ragoût de cerf surgelé

en: Wild boar stew
fr: Ragoût de sanglier

en: Frozen wild boar stew
fr: Ragoût de sanglier surgelé

en: Mountain products
bg: Планински продукти
de: Produkte von den Bergen, Bergprodukte, Gebirgsprodukte, Von den Bergen, Aus den Bergen, Aus dem Gebirge
es: Productos de montaña
fi: vuoristotuotteet
fr: Produits de montagne
hr: Planinskih proizvoda
it: Prodotti di montagna
nl: Bergproducten
zh: 高山产品